Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 824.400 is amended to read:
824.400. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall develop and implement a passenger rail plan
for the purposes of  increasing ridership on passenger trains and increasing ticket revenue. The
passenger rail plan must include, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) A marketing strategy.
(b) Strategies for boosting ridership.
(c) Strategies for boosting tourism through the use of passenger rail.
(d) Strategies for boosting capacity.
(e) Strategies for upgrading and improving railroad track and related infrastructure.
(f) Information  about federal rail infrastructure grant applications submitted, denied and
approved, provided in summary form.
(2) The department may coordinate with other state agencies to develop the plan.
(3) The department shall submit a quarterly report on  the performance of passenger rail
to the Joint Committee on Transportation in  the manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report
must include a summary of the number of  passengers utilizing passenger rail and on-time
performance for the previous quarter.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall work with  the Washington State
Department of Transportation, the British Columbia  Ministry of Transportation and
Infrastructure and other public bodies, as appropriate, to document and memorialize, in
whatever form is the  most appropriate, a shared regional approach to Cascades passenger
rail planning, funding and communications including:
(a) Developing a plan  to document the shared vision, goals and objectives for passenger
rail service and freight rail service within the Cascades Rail Corridor.
(b) Developing a plan to achieve performance goals, manage  fleet assets, share costs,
prioritize investments, improve infrastructure and resolve interagency disputes.
(c) Proposing funding options  to the respective legislative bodies to support the
infrastructure improvements and operation of passenger and freight trains  within the cor-
ridor.
Enrolled House Bill 3233 (HB 3233-A) Page 1
(d) Developing federal funding applications consistent with the shared plans described in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(e) Developing a stakeholder outreach program.
(f) Overseeing operations and marketing of daily passenger rail service in the corridor.
(2) The Department of Transportation may enter  into agreements with the Washington
State Department of Transportation to coordinate shared passenger rail  service development
plans.
(3) As  used in this section, “public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 824.430 is amended to read:
824.430. Before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Transportation  shall
report to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 about the following:
(1) The status of agreements with the Washington State Department of  Transportation and the
British Columbia  Ministry of Transportation and Infrastructure regarding the Cascades Rail Corri-
dor.
(2) The performance of passenger rail service within the corridor.
(3) The financial status of the corridor and financial  needs for passenger rail service within the
corridor.
(4) The status of developing the passenger  rail plan, actions taken to implement the plan
and any needed legislative changes.
(5) The  status of the shared regional approach and plans with the Washington State De-
partment of Transportation and the British Columbia Ministry  of Transportation and
Infrastructure regarding transportation by rail within the Cascades Rail Corridor.
SECTION 4.
The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements with the
Washington State Department of Transportation and other governmental entities in  order
to collaborate on developing shared objectives  for passenger and freight rail, developing re-
gional approaches to rail infrastructure improvements  and enabling joint proposals to federal
and other funding sources.
SECTION 5. ORS 824.410 is repealed.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3233 (HB 3233-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3233 (HB 3233-A) Page 3